Utah statutes.
31A-22-301.   Definitions.
As used in this part:
(1)  "Motor vehicle" has the same meaning as under Subsection 41-12a-103(4).
(2)  "Motor vehicle business" means a motor vehicle sales agency, repair shop,
service station, storage garage, or public parking place.
(3)  "Motor vehicle liability policy" means a policy which satisfies the
requirements of Sections 31A-22-303 and 31A-22-304.
(4)  "Occupying" means being in or on a motor vehicle as a passenger or
operator, or being engaged in the immediate acts of entering, boarding, or
alighting from a motor vehicle.
(5)  "Operator" has the same meaning as under Subsection 41-12a-103(7).
(6)  "Owner" has the same meaning as under Subsection 41-12a-103(8).
(7)  "Pedestrian" means any natural person not occupying a motor vehicle.
